Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 52
PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOLS

Section.

33-5201. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Public Charter Schools Act of 1998.”

33-5202. Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the legislature to provide opportunities for teachers, parents, students, and community members to establish and maintain public charter schools that operate independently from the existing traditional school district structure but within the existing public school system. In order to accomplish any of the following, public charter schools shall have equal access and authority to participate in all state and federal programs to the same extent as a traditional public school, irrespective of the instructional delivery method:

Improve student learning;

Increase learning opportunities for all students, with special emphasis on expanded learning experiences for students;

Include the use of different and innovative teaching methods;

Utilize virtual distance learning and online learning;

Create new professional opportunities for teachers, including the opportunity to be responsible for the learning program at the school site;

Provide parents and students with expanded choices in the types of educational opportunities that are available within the public school system;

Hold the schools established under this chapter accountable for meeting measurable student educational standards.

33-5202A. Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Authorized chartering entity” means any of the following:

A local board of trustees of a school district in this state;

The public charter school commission created pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

An Idaho public college, university or community college;

A private, nonprofit, Idaho-based nonsectarian college or university that is accredited by the same organization that accredits Idaho public colleges and universities.

“Charter” means the grant of authority approved by the authorized chartering entity to the board of directors of the public charter school.

“Charter holder” means the public charter school’s board of directors to which a charter is granted pursuant to chapter 52, title 33, Idaho Code.

“Educational services provider” means a nonprofit or for-profit entity that contracts with a public charter school to provide educational services and resources including administrative support and educational design, implementation or management.

“Founder” means a person, including employees or staff of a public charter school, who makes a material contribution toward the establishment of a public charter school in accordance with criteria determined by the board of directors of the public charter school, and who is designated as such at the time the board of directors acknowledges and accepts such contribution. The criteria for determining when a person is a founder shall not discriminate against any person on any basis prohibited by the federal or state constitution or any federal, state or local law. The designation of a person as a founder, and the admission preferences available to the children of a founder, shall not constitute pecuniary benefits.

“Performance certificate” means a fixed-term, renewable certificate between a public charter school and an authorized chartering entity that outlines the roles, powers, responsibilities and performance expectations for each party to the certificate.

“Petition” means the document submitted by a person or persons to the authorized chartering entity to request the creation of a public charter school.

“Career technical regional public charter school” means a public charter secondary school authorized under this chapter to provide programs in career technical education that meet the standards and qualifications established by the division of career technical education. A career technical regional public charter school may be approved by an authorized chartering entity and, by the terms of its charter, shall operate in association with at least two (2) school districts. This provision does not exclude a public charter school with a statewide boundary from applying for added cost funds authorized for career technical education, irrespective of the instructional delivery method. Participating school districts need not be contiguous.

“Public charter school” means a school that is authorized under this chapter to deliver public education in Idaho with equal access and authority to participate in all state and federal programs to the same extent as a traditional public school, irrespective of the instructional delivery method.

“Traditional public school” means any school existing or to be built that is operated and controlled by a school district in this state.
(11) “Virtual school” means either a public charter school or a traditional public school that delivers a full-time, sequential program of synchronous and/or asynchronous instruction primarily through the use of technology via the internet in a distributed environment. Schools classified as virtual must have an online component to their school with online lessons and tools for student and data management.

33-5203. Authorization — Limitations.

The creation of public charter schools is hereby authorized. Public charter schools shall be part of the state’s program of public education.

New public charter schools, which may begin educational instruction in any one (1) school year, shall be subject to the following:

No whole school district may be converted to a charter district or any configuration that includes all schools as public charter schools; and

A petition must be received by the initial authorized chartering entity no later than September 1 to be eligible to begin instruction the first complete school year following receipt of the petition, unless the authorized chartering entity agrees to a later date; and

To begin operations, a newly chartered public school must be authorized by no later than January 1 of the previous school year.

A public charter school may be formed either by creating a new public charter school or by replicating an existing high-performing public charter school, which charter may be approved by any authorized chartering entity, or by converting an existing traditional public school to a public charter school, which charter may only be approved by the board of trustees of the school district in which the existing public school is located.

No charter shall be approved under this chapter:

Which provides for the conversion of any existing private or parochial school to a public charter school.

To a for-profit entity or any school that is operated by a for-profit entity, provided however, nothing herein shall prevent the board of directors of a public charter school from legally contracting with for-profit entities for the provision of products or services that aid in the operation of the school.

By the board of trustees of a school district if the public charter school’s physical location is outside the boundaries of the authorizing school district.

A public virtual school charter may be approved by any authorized chartering entity except a local school district board of trustees. In addition, a charter may also be approved by the state board of education pursuant to section 33-5207(5)(b), Idaho Code.

A charter holder may not operate enterprises other than the public charter schools for which it has been authorized.

The state board of education shall adopt rules, subject to law, to establish a consistent application and review process for the approval and maintenance of all public charter schools.

Each public charter school authorized by an authorized chartering entity other than a local school district board of trustees is hereby designated as a local education agency (LEA) as such term is defined in 34 CFR 300.28. Public charter schools chartered by the board of trustees of a school district may also be designated by the board of trustees as an LEA, with the concurrence of the public charter school board of directors. Otherwise, the public charter school shall be included in that district’s LEA.

33-5204. Nonprofit corporation — Liability — Insurance.

A public charter school shall be organized and managed under the Idaho nonprofit corporation act. The board of directors of a public charter school shall be deemed public agents authorized by a public school district, the public charter school commission, or the state board of education to control the public charter school, but shall function independently of any school board of trustees in any school district in which the public charter school is located or independently of the public charter school commission, except as provided in the charter. The nonprofit board as the charter holder may hold multiple charters under the following conditions:

Each public charter school must have its own performance certificate; and

Each public charter school must be independently accountable for its academic, financial and operational outcomes.

For the purposes of section 59-1302(15), Idaho Code, a public charter school created pursuant to this chapter shall be deemed a governmental entity. Pursuant to the provisions of section 63-3622O, Idaho Code, sales to or purchases by a public charter school are exempt from payment of the sales and use tax. A public charter school and the board of directors of a public charter school are subject to the provisions of:

Sections 18-1351 through 18-1362, Idaho Code, on bribery and corrupt influence, except as provided by section 33-5204A(2), Idaho Code;

Chapter 5, title 74, Idaho Code, on prohibitions against contracts with officers;

Chapter 4, title 74, Idaho Code, on ethics in government;

Chapter 2, title 74, Idaho Code, on open public meetings; and

Chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, on disclosure of public records;

A public charter school may sue or be sued, purchase, receive, hold and convey real and personal property for school purposes, and borrow money for such purposes, to the same extent and on the same conditions as a traditional public school district, and its employees, directors and officers shall enjoy the same immunities as employees, directors and officers of traditional public school districts and other public schools, including those provided by chapter 9, title 6, Idaho Code. The authorized chartering entity that approves a public school charter shall have no liability for the acts, omissions, debts or other obligations of a public charter school, except as may be provided in the charter. A local public school district shall have no liability for the acts, omissions, debts or other obligations of a public charter school located in its district that has been approved by an authorized chartering entity other than the board of trustees of the local school district.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent the board of directors of a public charter school, operating as a nonprofit corporation, from borrowing money to finance the purchase or lease of school building facilities, equipment and furnishings of those school building facilities. Subject to the terms of a contractual agreement between the board and a lender, nothing herein shall prevent the board from using the facility, its equipment and furnishings as collateral for the loan.

Public charter schools shall secure insurance for liability and property loss.

It shall be unlawful for:

Any director to have pecuniary interest, directly or indirectly, in any contract or other transaction pertaining to the maintenance or conduct of the authorized chartering entity and charter or to accept any reward or compensation for services rendered as a director except as may be otherwise provided in this subsection. The board of directors of a public charter school may accept and award contracts involving the public charter school to businesses in which the director or a person related to him by blood or marriage within the second degree has a direct or indirect interest, provided that the procedures set forth in section 18-1361 or 18-1361A, Idaho Code, are followed. The receiving, soliciting or acceptance of moneys of a public charter school for deposit in any bank or trust company, or the lending of moneys by any bank or trust company to any public charter school, shall not be deemed to be a contract pertaining to the maintenance or conduct of a public charter school and authorized chartering entity within the meaning of this section; nor shall the payment by any public charter school board of directors of compensation to any bank or trust company for services rendered in the transaction of any banking business with such public charter school board of directors be deemed the payment of any reward or compensation to any officer or director of any such bank or trust company within the meaning of this section.

The board of directors of any public charter school to enter into or execute any contract with the spouse of any member of such board, the terms of which said contract require, or will require, the payment or delivery of any public charter school funds, moneys or property to such spouse, except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection or in section 18-1361 or 18-1361A, Idaho Code.

No spouse of any director may be employed by a public charter school physically located within the boundaries of a school district with a fall student enrollment population of greater than one thousand two hundred (1,200) in the prior school year. For public charter schools physically located within the boundaries of a school district with a fall student enrollment population of one thousand two hundred (1,200) or less in the prior school year, such spouse may be employed in a nonadministrative position for a school year if each of the following conditions has been met:

The position has been listed as open for application on the public charter school website or in a local newspaper, whichever is consistent with the school’s current practice, and the position shall be listed for at least sixty (60) days, unless the opening occurred during the school year, in which case the position shall be so listed for at least fifteen (15) days. If the position is listed in a newspaper, the listing shall be made in a manner consistent with the provisions of section 60-106, Idaho Code;

No applications were received that met the minimum certification, endorsement, education or experience requirements of the position other than such spouse;

The director abstained from voting in the employment of the spouse and was absent from the meeting while such employment was being considered and determined.

in the same manner that a traditional public school and the board of school trustees of a school district are subject to those provisions.

The public charter school may employ such spouse for further school years, provided that the conditions contained in this paragraph are met for each school year in which such spouse is employed. The director shall abstain from voting in any decisions affecting the compensation, benefits, individual performance evaluation or disciplinary action related to the spouse and shall be absent from the meeting while such issues are being considered and determined. Such limitation shall include, but not be limited to: any matters relating to negotiations regarding compensation and benefits; discussion and negotiation with district benefits providers; and any matter relating to the spouse and letters of reprimand, direction, probation or termination. Such limitations shall not prohibit the trustee spouse from participating in deliberation and voting upon the district’s annual fiscal budget or annual audit report. Any spouse of a director employed as a certificated employee pursuant to this paragraph shall be employed under a category 1 contract pursuant to section 33-514A, Idaho Code.
(7) When any relative of any director or relative of the spouse of a director related by affinity or consanguinity within the second degree is to be considered for employment in a public charter school, such director shall abstain from voting in the election of such relative and shall be absent from the meeting while such employment is being considered and determined.

33-5204A. Applicability of professional codes and standards — Limitations upon authority.

Every person who serves in a public charter school, either as an employee, contractor, or otherwise, in the capacity of teacher, supervisor, administrator, education specialist, school nurse or librarian, must comply with the professional codes and standards approved by the state board of education, including standards for ethics or conduct.

Every employee of a public charter school and every member of the board of directors of a public charter school, whether compensated or noncompensated, shall comply with the standards of ethics or conduct applicable to public officials including, but not limited to, chapter 4, title 74, Idaho Code, except that section 74-405, Idaho Code, which permits a noncompensated public official to have an interest in a contract made or entered into by the board of which he is a member under certain conditions, shall not apply to the board of directors of a public charter school. A member of the board of directors of a public charter school is prohibited from receiving a personal pecuniary benefit, directly or indirectly, pertaining to a contractual relationship with the public charter school.

33-5205. Petition to establish public charter school.

Intent. Any group of persons, upon creating a nonprofit corporation pursuant to section 33-5204, Idaho Code, may petition to establish a new public charter school, or to convert an existing traditional public school to a public charter school. The purpose of the charter petition is to present the proposed public charter school’s academic and operational vision and plans, demonstrate the petitioner’s capacities to execute the proposed vision and plans and provide the authorized chartering entity a clear basis for assessing the applicant’s plans and capacities. An approved charter petition shall not serve as the school’s performance certificate.

New Public Charter School Petition. Except for a petition to establish a new virtual school, which shall follow subsection (6) of this section, or to convert an existing traditional public school, which shall follow subsection (7) of this section, a petition to establish a new public charter school shall follow the process set forth in subsections (3) through (5) of this section.

Application.

The state board of education, by rule, shall develop an application to establish a new public charter school which, when submitted by petitioners, shall constitute the public charter school’s completed petition. The application is not intended to be exhaustive, but shall require petitioners to provide descriptions of the following key features of the prospective public charter school:

Educational program, including student academic proficiency and growth standards and measurement methods and any mission-specific standards that may be unique to the school;

Financial and facilities plan;

Board capacity and governance structure; and

Student demand and primary attendance area.

Prior to submitting the completed petition to an authorized chartering entity described in section 33-5202A(1), Idaho Code, petitioners shall send a letter and a copy of the completed petition to the superintendent of each district that overlaps the proposed public charter school’s primary attendance area. The purpose of the letter is to inform the superintendent that petitioners are seeking an authorizer, and to offer to attend a district board of trustees meeting, if the superintendent so requests.

A minimum of four (4) weeks after sending the letter and copy of the completed petition pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection, or earlier if the superintendent of each district that overlaps the proposed public charter school’s primary attendance area agrees, petitioners may submit the completed petition to an authorized chartering entity pursuant to section 33-5202A(1), Idaho Code. Upon receipt of the completed petition, which may be received electronically, representatives of the authorized chartering entity shall review, and may contract with a third party or other government agency to assist in reviewing, the petition. If necessary, representatives of the authorized chartering entity may request from petitioners limited additional information necessary to clarify the contents of the completed petition. Any subsequent change to the completed petition will comprise the revised petition.
(4) Hearing. If the authorized chartering entity is the public charter school commission, within ten (10) weeks of receiving a revised petition and not later than twelve (12) weeks after receiving the completed petition, commission staff shall provide commissioners with a written recommendation that the commission either approve, deny or grant conditional approval of the petition. Concurrently, the commission staff shall provide a copy of the recommendation to petitioners, along with a notice of a hearing date, and shall notify the district in which the proposed charter school will be physically located of the opportunity to submit written comments or to testify at the hearing. Petitioners may testify to support or refute the recommendation. If the authorized chartering entity is other than the public charter school commission, it may develop its own hearing process.

The learning management system by which courses will be delivered;

The role of the online teacher, including the consistent availability of the teacher to provide guidance around course material, methods of individualized learning in the online course and the means by which student work will be assessed;

A plan for the provision of professional development specific to the public virtual school environment;

The means by which public virtual school students will receive appropriate teacher-to-student interaction, including timely and frequent feedback about student progress;

The means by which the public virtual school will verify student attendance and award course credit. Attendance at public virtual schools shall focus primarily on coursework and activities that are correlated to the Idaho state thoroughness standards;

A plan for the provision of technical support relevant to the delivery of online courses;

The means by which the public virtual school will provide opportunity for student-to-student interaction; and

A plan for ensuring equal access for all students, including the provision of necessary hardware, software and internet connectivity required for participation in online coursework.
(7) Conversion Charter Schools. A petition to convert an existing traditional public school shall be submitted to the board of trustees of the district in which the school is located for review and approval. The petition shall be signed by not less than sixty percent (60%) of the teachers currently employed by the school district at the school to be converted, and by one (1) or more parents or guardians of not less than sixty percent (60%) of the students currently attending the school to be converted. Each petition submitted to convert an existing school or to establish a new charter school shall contain a copy of the articles of incorporation and the bylaws of the nonprofit corporation, which shall be deemed incorporated into the petition.

(5) Petition Decision. If the authorized chartering entity approves the petition, the parties shall negotiate the terms of the performance certificate pursuant to section 33-5205B, Idaho Code. If the authorized chartering entity grants conditional approval, the conditions may be considered reasonable pre-opening requirements or conditions pursuant to section 33-5206, Idaho Code, or may be added to the charter upon agreement of petitioners and the authorized chartering entity.

(6) Virtual Schools.

(a) In the case of a petition for a public virtual charter school, if the primary attendance area described in the petition of a proposed public virtual charter school extends within the boundaries of five (5) or fewer local school districts, the prospective authorizer shall provide notice in writing to those local school districts of the public hearing no less than thirty (30) days prior to the public hearing. The public hearing shall include any oral or written comments that an authorized representative of the local school districts may provide regarding the merits of the petition and any potential impacts on the school districts.

(b) An authorized chartering entity, except for a school district board of trustees, may approve a charter for a public virtual school under the provisions of this chapter only if it determines that the petition contains the requirements of subsection (2) of this section and the additional statements describing the following:

(8) Term. An initial charter, if approved, shall be granted for a term of five (5) operating years. This term shall commence on July 1 preceding the public charter school’s first year of operation.

33-5205A. Transfer of charter.

A charter and performance certificate for a public charter school may be transferred to, and placed under the chartering authority of, any authorized chartering entity if the current authorizer, the receiving authorizer, and the board of directors of the public charter school all agree to such transfer, including any revision to the charter and performance certificate that may be required in connection with such transfer. Provided however, that a charter and performance certificate shall not be transferred to a school district board of trustees in which the public charter school is not physically located. A request to transfer a charter may be initiated by the board of directors of a public charter school or by the authorized chartering entity with chartering authority over the charter of such public charter school.

A public charter school, authorized by any authorized chartering entity except a school district board of trustees, which has a primary attendance area located within more than one (1) school district, may transfer the physical location of its public charter school within its primary attendance area to locate the facilities within the boundaries of another school district within the primary attendance area if the authorized chartering entity, the board of trustees of each of the relevant school districts and the board of directors of the public charter school all approve of such transfer of facilities location, and if the authorized chartering entity approves any revisions to the charter that may be required in connection with such transfer.

If all parties fail to reach agreement in regard to the request to transfer a charter and performance certificate, as required herein, then the matter may be appealed directly to the state board of education. With respect to such appeal, the state board of education shall substantially follow the procedure as provided in section 33-5207(5)(b), Idaho Code. A transferred charter school shall not be considered a new public charter school.

33-5205B. Performance certificates.

Within seventy-five (75) days of approval of a charter application, the authorized chartering entity and the governing board of the approved public charter school shall execute a performance certificate that clearly sets forth the academic and operational performance expectations and measures by which the public charter school will be judged and the administrative relationship between the authorized chartering entity and public charter school, including each party’s rights and duties. The performance expectations and measures set forth in the performance certificate shall include, but need not be limited to, applicable federal and state accountability requirements. The performance provisions may be refined or amended by mutual agreement after the public charter school is operating and has collected baseline achievement data for its enrolled students.

The performance certificate shall be signed by the president of the authorized chartering entity’s governing board and the president of the public charter school’s governing body. Within fourteen (14) days of executing a performance certificate, the authorized chartering entity shall submit to the state board of education written notification of the performance certificate execution, including a copy of the performance certificate.

No public charter school may commence operations without a performance certificate executed in accordance with this provision and approved in an open meeting of the authorized chartering entity’s governing board.

All public charter schools approved prior to July 1, 2013, shall execute performance certificates with their authorizers no later than July 1, 2014. Such certificates shall ensure that each public charter school approved prior to July 1, 2014, is evaluated for renewal or nonrenewal between March 1, 2016, and March 1, 2019.

33-5205C. Public charter school replication.

Public charter schools may petition for replication, subject to the following provisions:

The public charter schools must have successfully completed at least one (1) renewal cycle and be eligible for a nonconditional renewal; or

Public charter schools that are scheduled to be evaluated for renewal or nonrenewal between March 1, 2016, and March 1, 2019, must be rated in the top twenty percent (20%) of all Idaho public schools by the state’s accountability system for the two (2) previous years.

Replication public charter schools must serve the same, or a subset of the same, grades as the public charter school being replicated and the operational model must be the same as that of the public charter school being replicated.

A public charter school authorized by the public charter school commission or an Idaho college or university pursuant to section 33-5202A, Idaho Code, must provide written notice and opportunity to comment to the school district for which the replication school will be located at least thirty (30) days prior to submitting the replication request to the authorizing entity. The petitioner must provide written notice to the state department of education at the time the petition is submitted to the authorized chartering entity.

A school district authorizer may not approve the replication of a public charter school that is physically located outside of the authorizer’s school district boundaries.

Replication petitions are not subject to a sufficiency review by the state department of education.

The replicated public charter schools under a single charter holder shall be authorized and funded as separate schools. The charter holder must obtain annual independent comprehensive fiscal audits that treat each school as a separate component unit. Funds appropriated by the state must be used toward the operations of the public charter school for which they were appropriated. This does not prohibit multiple public charter schools under a single charter holder from combining resources toward administrative or program costs or prohibit public charter schools from participating in cooperative education services pursuant to sections 33-315 and 33-316, Idaho Code.

Authorized chartering entities must establish policies regarding the criteria that will be considered when evaluating a petition for replication. Such criteria must include at a minimum the following replication petition requirements:

A description of the capacity of the charter holder to successfully replicate an additional school;

A description of how the charter holder will manage multiple charter schools while maintaining a high level of academic and fiscal performance in the original public charter school and the replication school; and

A description of how the charter holder will incorporate representation and input in the school operations from the local area where the replication public charter school is physically located if the location is outside of the school district of the public charter school being replicated.